Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-604
Multiple office holding; when allowed.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (4) of this section, no person shall be precluded from being elected or appointed to or holding an elective office for the reason that he or she has been elected or appointed to or holds another elective office.

(2) No person serving as a member of the Legislature or in an elective office described in Article IV, section 1 or 20, or Article VII, section 3 or 10, of the Constitution of Nebraska shall simultaneously serve in any other elective office, except that such a person may simultaneously serve in another elective office which is filled at an election held in conjunction with the annual meeting of a public body.

(3) Whenever an incumbent serving as a member of the Legislature or in an elective office described in Article IV, section 1 or 20, or Article VII, section 3 or 10, of the Constitution of Nebraska assumes another elective office, except an elective office filled at an election held in conjunction with the annual meeting of a public body, the office first held by the incumbent shall be deemed vacant.

(4) No person serving in a high elective office shall simultaneously serve in any other high elective office, except that (a) a county attorney may serve as the county attorney for more than one county if appointed under subsection (2) of section 23-1201.01 and (b) a county sheriff may serve as the county sheriff for more than one county if appointed under subsection (4) of section 23-1701.

(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, any person holding more than one high elective office upon July 15, 2010, shall be entitled to serve the remainder of all terms for which he or she was elected or appointed.

(6) For purposes of this section, (a) elective office has the meaning found in section 32-109 and includes an office which is filled at an election held in conjunction with the annual meeting of a public body created by an act of the Legislature but does not include a member of a learning community coordinating council appointed pursuant to subsection (5) or (7) of section 32-546.01 prior to January 5, 2017, and (b) high elective office means a member of the Legislature, an elective office described in Article IV, section 1 or 20, or Article VII, section 3 or 10, of the Constitution of Nebraska, or a county, city, community college area, learning community, regional metropolitan transit authority, or school district elective office.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 172;

Laws 1997, LB 221, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 84, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB951, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB492, § 38;

Laws 2024, LB894, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB784, § 5.
July 18, 2026